Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Jurisdiction, Powers and Authority, Vacation Matters

§ 9-5-81.
Jurisdiction of the chancery court, in general.

The chancery court in addition to the full jurisdiction in all the matters and cases expressly conferred upon it by the constitution shall have jurisdiction of all cases transferred to it by the circuit court or remanded to it by the supreme court; and such further jurisdiction, as is, in this chapter or elsewhere, provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 54, arts. 2 (1), 10 (4); 1857, ch. 62, art. 2; 1871, § 974; 1880, § 1829; 1892, § 482; 1906, § 532; Hemingway’s 1917, § 289; 1930, § 351; 1942, § 1262.

§ 9-5-83.
Court may determine all matters in estates administered.

The court in which a will may have been admitted to probate, letters of administration granted, or a guardian may have been appointed, shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine all questions in relation to the execution of the trust of the executor, administrator, guardian, or other officer appointed for the administration and management of the estate, and all demands against it by heirs at law, distributees, devisees, legatees, wards, creditors, or others; and shall have jurisdiction of all cases in which bonds or other obligations shall have been executed in any proceeding in relation to the estate, or other proceedings, had in said chancery court, to hear and determine upon proper proceedings and evidence, the liability of the obligors in such bond or obligation, whether as principal or surety, and by decree and process to enforce such liability.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 976; 1880, § 1834; 1892, § 504; 1906, § 554; Hemingway’s 1917, § 314; 1930, § 352; 1942, § 1263.

§ 9-5-85.
Court may summon all persons and punish for contempt.

The chancery court shall have power to issue a summons for any person, or subpoena for any witness, whose appearance in court may be deemed necessary for any purpose, whether such party or witness reside in the same or any other county. It shall be the duty of the party summoned or subpoenaed, to attend the court according to the command of the process; and if it be necessary or proper to enforce the appearance of the party, the court, on the return of the process executed and failure to appear, may issue an attachment, and may fine the party when brought in for a contempt. If a witness before the court shall refuse to testify, the court may commit such witness for contempt of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 980; 1880, § 1835; 1892, § 506; 1906, § 557; Hemingway’s 1917, § 317; 1930, § 366; 1942, § 1277.

§ 9-5-87.
Power to punish for violation of injunction.

The chancery court, or the chancellor in vacation, or judge granting the writ, shall have power to punish any person for breach of injunction, or any other order, decree, or process of the court, by fine or imprisonment, or both, or the chancellor or judge granting the writ may require bail for the appearance of the party at the next term of the court to answer for the contempt; but such person shall be first cited to appear and answer. And any person so punished by order of the chancellor in vacation, may on five (5) days’ notice to the opposite party, apply to a judge of the Supreme Court, who, for good cause shown, may supersede the punishment until the meeting of the said chancery court.

At the discretion of the court, any person found in contempt for failure to pay child support and imprisoned therefor may be referred for placement in a state, county or municipal restitution, house arrest or restorative justice center or program, provided such person meets the qualifications prescribed in Section 99-37-19.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1846; 1892, § 509; 1906, § 560; Hemingway’s 1917, § 320; 1930, § 367; 1942, § 1278; Laws, 2009, ch. 367, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 9-5-89.
Guardian ad litem; appointment and compensation; effect of failure to appoint.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to any infant or defendant of unsound mind, and allow him suitable compensation payable out of the estate of such party, but the appointment shall not be made except when the court shall consider it necessary for the protection of the interest of such defendant; and a decree or judgment of any court shall not be void or erroneous because of the failure to have a guardian ad litem.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 54, art. 2(45); 1857, ch. 62, art. 52; 1871, § 1031; 1880, § 1894; 1892, § 553; 1906, § 604; Hemingway’s 1917, § 364; 1930, § 398; 1942, § 1309.

§ 9-5-91.
Information to be provided to Administrative Office of Courts by
chancery clerk in chancery cases in which guardian ad litem is appointed.

In a chancery case in which a guardian ad litem is appointed by the court, it is the duty of the chancery clerk to prepare and forward to the Administrative Office of Courts the information described by subsection (2) of this section not later than the last day of the month following the entry of an order approving any payment to the guardian ad litem.

The clerk shall prepare and forward the following information when filed in a contested case where the guardian ad litem fees exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00):

A copy of any invoice for guardian ad litem fees;

A copy of any order directing payment of guardian ad litem fees; and

A copy of any petition seeking recovery of guardian ad litem fees, as well as any orders concerning payment of guardian ad litem fees, including, but not limited to, orders of contempt.

If an order previously reported under subsection (1) of this section is amended by order of the court, the clerk shall forward the subsequent court order not later than the last day of the month following the entry of the amended order.

The duty of a clerk to prepare and forward information under this section is not affected by:

Any subsequent appeal of the court order;

Any subsequent modification of the court order; or

The expiration of the court order.

This section does not apply to youth court matters.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 418, § 2, effective upon passage (April 1, 2017).

§ 9-5-93.
Trial of causes in vacation; power to enter decree prior to adjournment of next succeeding term.

Whenever the chancery court or chancellor has lawfully set any matter in vacation for confirmation or decree, and no contest has been timely filed, if an order or decree determining the same or setting another date therefor be not entered upon such date, the chancellor shall have the power to enter an order or decree on any day prior to the adjournment of the next succeeding term, without further process. Provided, that if the matter be one in which contest might have been entered prior to the date set and such contest be filed before the entry of such order or decree, the same shall be disposed of as if such contest had been timely filed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1228.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 213, eff July 1, 1956.

§ 9-5-95.
Court or chancellor may extend time in vacation.

The court or chancellor in vacation shall have power in proper cases for good cause shown to grant a reasonable enlargement of the time for the filing of an answer or answers, or of a demurrer or demurrers, and shall have power in like cases and for like cause shown to set aside decrees pro confesso and thereupon to permit the filing of answer or answers. But no such enlargement of time should be granted where the request therefor is solely for delay or is the result of inexcusable neglect on the part of the defendant or his solicitor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 321; 1942, § 1229; Laws, 1924, ch. 151.

§ 9-5-97.
Additional powers of chancellor in vacation.

In the matter of ordering, decreeing and confirming sales of real and personal property of decedents, or of minors, or of persons of unsound mind, and in all other matters testamentary or of administration, in minors’ business, matters affecting persons of unsound mind, and in the matter of the removal of disabilities of minority, the chancellors of the several districts of this state are hereby authorized and empowered to do in vacation all things, and to exercise all the powers in such matters that could be done by them in term time; and all laws governing the action of the chancery court in such matters, and the process and procedure therein, shall apply when the chancellor shall act therein in vacation; but before any sale of real estate shall be confirmed by the chancellor in vacation, the parties in interest shall have notice thereof as provided by law in the matter of confirming sales by chancellors in vacation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 507; Hemingway’s 1917, § 263; 1930, § 322; 1942, § 1230; Laws, 1900, ch. 92.

§§ 9-5-99 and 9-5-101.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§9-5-99. [Codes, 1942, § 1231; Laws, 1932, ch. 143]

§9-5-101. [Codes, 1942, § 1231; Laws, 1932, ch. 143]

§ 9-5-103.
Bonds of receivers, assignees, executors may be reduced or cancelled, if excessive or for sufficient cause.

Whenever it shall appear by petition to the chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, that any bond given by an assignee, receiver, executor, administrator, guardian, or trustee is in excess of the value of the estate being administered, and as such is an unnecessary expense to the estate, or that other sufficient cause appears for so doing, the chancery court or chancellor in vacation may, after five days’ service of copy of said petition on the surety, cancel the bond or reduce the same to an amount sufficient to protect the estate, or accept a new bond in substitution of an existing one. However, the decree rendered shall not affect the liability upon a bond which accrued prior to its cancellation, reduction or substitution.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 264; 1930, § 323; 1942, § 1233; Laws, 1914, ch. 155; Laws, 1940, ch. 234; Laws, 1958, ch. 232.

§ 9-5-105.
Expense of chancellor in hearing vacation matter paid equally by parties.

When any chancellor in this state shall, by agreement of the parties, hear any cause or matter in vacation, at any place, other than the place of his residence, all expenses incurred by him in attendance upon said hearing, shall be paid equally by the parties thereto, upon the chancellor’s filing an itemized statement thereof, with the clerk of the chancery court of the county in which such matter shall be pending; and when at any such hearing the attendance of the court reporter shall be required his actual expenses shall be likewise paid.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 324; 1942, § 1234; Laws, 1924, ch. 153.